Maine, session 132, LD622.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§22-C is enacted to read:
22-C. Electric vehicle. "Electric vehicle" means a fully electric vehicle that has an
onboard electrical energy storage device that is designed to be recharged using an external
energy source or a vehicle that is designed to operate using electricity produced from
compressed hydrogen fuel.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §501, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. Electric vehicle registration surcharge. In addition to the payment of other
applicable registration fees under this section, and except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the Secretary of State shall require payment of an annual electric vehicle
registration surcharge by the owner of an electric vehicle.
A. The annual electric vehicle registration surcharge under this subsection is $250.
B. The annual electric vehicle registration surcharge under this subsection may be paid
in 2 biannual payments.
C. Notwithstanding section 409 or any other provision of law to the contrary, the
surcharges collected pursuant to this subsection must be transmitted to the Treasurer
of State and credited to the Highway Fund.
The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.